dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK.aff
FLAG num
#Substantiv, ender på el, -ler i flertal
SFX 64 Y 164
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz]el	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^b]bel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^c]cel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^d]del	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^f]fel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^g]gel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^h]hel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^j]jel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^k]kel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^l]lel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^m]mel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^n]nel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^p]pel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^q]qel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^r]rel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^s]sel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^t]tel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^v]vel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^w]wel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^x]xel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el ler/34 [^z]zel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 bel ler/34 bbel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 cel ler/34 ccel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 del ler/34 ddel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 fel ler/34 ffel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 gel ler/34 ggel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 hel ler/34 hhel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 jel ler/34 jjel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 kel ler/34 kkel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 lel ler/34 llel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 mel ler/34 mmel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 nel ler/34 nnel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 pel ler/34 ppel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 qel ler/34 qqel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 rel ler/34 rrel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 sel ler/34 ssel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 tel ler/34 ttel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 vel ler/34 vvel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 wel ler/34 wwel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 xel ler/34 xxel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 zel ler/34 zzel	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^b]bel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^c]cel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^d]del	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^f]fel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^g]gel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^h]hel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^j]jel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^k]kel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^l]lel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^m]mel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^n]nel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^p]pel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^q]qel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^r]rel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^s]sel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^t]tel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^v]vel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^w]wel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^x]xel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lers/34 [^z]zel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 bel lers/34 bbel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 cel lers/34 ccel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 del lers/34 ddel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 fel lers/34 ffel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 gel lers/34 ggel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 hel lers/34 hhel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 jel lers/34 jjel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 kel lers/34 kkel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 lel lers/34 llel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 mel lers/34 mmel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 nel lers/34 nnel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 pel lers/34 ppel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 qel lers/34 qqel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 rel lers/34 rrel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 sel lers/34 ssel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 tel lers/34 ttel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 vel lers/34 vvel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 wel lers/34 wwel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 xel lers/34 xxel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 zel lers/34 zzel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^b]bel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^c]cel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^d]del	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^f]fel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^g]gel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^h]hel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^j]jel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^k]kel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^l]lel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^m]mel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^n]nel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^p]pel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^q]qel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^r]rel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^s]sel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^t]tel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^v]vel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^w]wel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^x]xel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lerne/34 [^z]zel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 bel lerne/34 bbel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 cel lerne/34 ccel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 del lerne/34 ddel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 fel lerne/34 ffel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 gel lerne/34 ggel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 hel lerne/34 hhel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 jel lerne/34 jjel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 kel lerne/34 kkel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 lel lerne/34 llel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 mel lerne/34 mmel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 nel lerne/34 nnel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 pel lerne/34 ppel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 qel lerne/34 qqel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 rel lerne/34 rrel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 sel lerne/34 ssel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 tel lerne/34 ttel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 vel lerne/34 vvel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 wel lerne/34 wwel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 xel lerne/34 xxel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 zel lerne/34 zzel	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^b]bel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^c]cel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^d]del	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^f]fel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^g]gel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^h]hel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^j]jel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^k]kel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^l]lel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^m]mel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^n]nel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^p]pel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^q]qel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^r]rel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^s]sel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^t]tel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^v]vel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^w]wel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^x]xel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 el lernes/34 [^z]zel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 bel lernes/34 bbel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 cel lernes/34 ccel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 del lernes/34 ddel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 fel lernes/34 ffel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 gel lernes/34 ggel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 hel lernes/34 hhel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 jel lernes/34 jjel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 kel lernes/34 kkel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 lel lernes/34 llel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 mel lernes/34 mmel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 nel lernes/34 nnel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 pel lernes/34 ppel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 qel lernes/34 qqel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 rel lernes/34 rrel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 sel lernes/34 ssel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 tel lernes/34 ttel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 vel lernes/34 vvel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 wel lernes/34 wwel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 xel lernes/34 xxel	+GENITIV
SFX 64 zel lernes/34 zzel	+GENITIV
