dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK.dic
afladshandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
afskrækningsmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
aktiehandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
analkirtel/64,65,10,34,39,31
anoabøffel/64,65,10,34,39,31
antikvarboghandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
arbejdstidsregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
artemistempel/64,10,34,66,39,31
aspargeskartoffel/64,65,10,34,39,31
aurikel/64,65,10,34,39,31
bagaksel/64,65,10,34,39,31
banecykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
barsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
befordringsmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
benzindæksel/64,10,34,66,39
bestillingsseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
bevismiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
billedbibel/64,65,44,10,39,31
binomialformel/64,65,44,10,39,31
bittermandel/64,65,10,34,39,31
blomsterhandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
blærehalskirtel/64,65,10,34,39,31
bogtitel/64,65,10,34,39,31
bortkørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
Brewstervinkel/64,65,10,34,39,31
bryggekedel/64,65,10,34,39
bræddestabel/64,65,10,34,39,31
brødhumpel/64,65,44,10,39,31
bugmuskel/64,65,10,34,39,31
butikshandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
bændel/64,10,34,66,39,31
bøffel/64,65,10,34,39,31
børnemøbel/64,10,34,66,39,31
centervinkel/64,65,10,34,39,31
crosscykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
cymbel/64,65,44,10,39,31
dagpengeregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
datostempel/64,10,34,66,39,31
designermøbel/64,10,34,66,39,31
detailhandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
disciplinarmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
domkapitel/64,10,34,66,39,31
driftsmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
drossel/64,65,44,10,39,31
dyrehandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
dæksel/64,10,34,66,39
dørhængsel/64,10,34,66,39
egetræsmøbel/64,10,34,66,39,31
eksportartikel/64,65,10,34,39,31
elefantsnabel/64,65,10,34,39,31
elorgel/64,10,34,66,39,31 al:elorgelet al:elorgelets
energitilførsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
ergometercykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
fabel/64,65,44,10,39,31
familiesammenføringsregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
fedtkirtel/64,65,10,34,39,31
fibel/64,65,10,34,39,31
fiskekedel/64,65,10,34,39
floskel/64,65,10,34,39
fløjtekedel/64,65,10,34,39
follikel/64,65,10,34,39,31
foraksel/64,65,10,34,39,31
forholdsregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
fortyndingsmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
frankostempel/64,10,34,66,39,31
frøkapsel/64,65,10,34,39,31
fyreseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
færdselsregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
gadehandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
gatkirtel/64,65,10,34,39,31
genfødsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
genoverførsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
gigtmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
glatførekørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
gråskimmel/64,65,44,10,39,31
grundregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
gummistempel/64,10,34,66,39,31
gødningsmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
halvcykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
hammondorgel/64,10,34,66,39,31 al:hammondorgelet al:hammondorgelets
handicapkørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
hassel/64,65,44,10,39,31
heksekedel/64,65,10,34,39
hestehandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
hjemmefødsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
hjulaksel/64,65,10,34,39,31
holdtidskørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
hudehandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
hundredkroneseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
huskeseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
hybridcykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
hængsel/64,10,34,66,39,31
højspændingskabel/64,10,34,66,39,31
indenrigshandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
indgangsvinkel/64,65,10,34,39,31
indlæggelsesseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
insiderhandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
isolationsfængsel/64,10,34,66,39,29
jordkabel/64,10,34,66,39,31
kabel/64,10,34,66,39,31
kagegaffel/64,65,10,34,39,31
kalveschnitzel/64,65,44,10,39,31
kapitaltilførsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
karbunkel/64,65,10,34,39,31
kassecykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
kernebrændsel/64,10,34,66,39
kittel/64,65,10,34,39,31
klokkestabel/64,65,10,34,39,31
klæbemiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
knavel/64,65,10,34,39,31
koagel/64,10,34,66,39,31
kobberkedel/64,65,10,34,39
kombikedel/64,65,10,34,39
kondicykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
konserveringsmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
kontinentalsokkel/64,65,44,10,39,31
korncirkel/64,65,10,34,39,31
krakmandel/64,65,10,34,39,31
krumsabel/64,65,10,34,39,31
kulingvarsel/64,10,34,66,39,62
kunsttempel/64,10,34,66,39,31
kvasipartikel/64,65,10,34,39,31
kæbespytkirtel/64,65,10,34,39,31
kønskirtel/64,65,10,34,39,31
landevejscykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
låneseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
ledkapsel/64,65,10,34,39,31
leveregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
livscykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
lotteriseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
lukkemuskel/64,65,10,34,39,31
lædermøbel/64,10,34,66,39,31
lægmuskel/64,65,10,34,39,31
løgkuppel/64,65,10,34,39,31
malkeskammel/64,65,10,34,39,31
markedshandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
mellemhandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
mindeartikel/64,65,10,34,39,31
modforholdsregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
musikhandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
nakkehvirvel/64,65,10,34,39,31
naturmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
nudel/64,65,44,10,39,31
opkørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
ordensregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
overførsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
påkørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
passerseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
personpåkørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
pletfjerningsmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
pressionsmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
prægestempel/64,10,34,66,39,31
pustel/64,65,10,34,39,31
regneeksempel/64,10,34,66,39,31
retshandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
rigel/64,65,10,34,39,31
romancykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
rynkeorgel/64,10,34,66,39,31 al:rynkeorgelet al:rynkeorgelets
saltmandel/64,65,10,34,39,31
seddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
signaloverførsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
skibshandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
skråmuskel/64,65,10,34,39,31
skuffemøbel/64,10,34,66,39,31
slalomkørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
småpartikel/64,65,10,34,39,31
snabel/64,65,10,34,39,31
sokkel/64,65,44,10,39,31
specialhandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
spinningcykel/64,65,10,34,39,31
spytkirtel/64,65,10,34,39,31
startskammel/64,65,10,34,39,31
stivelsesmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
strejkevarsel/64,10,34,66,39,62
stueorgel/64,10,34,66,39,31 al:stueorgelet al:stueorgelets
surrogatfængsel/64,10,34,66,39,29
svumpukkel/64,65,10,34,39,31
særstempel/64,10,34,66,39,31
talgkirtel/64,65,10,34,39,31
telefonkabel/64,10,34,66,39,31
testkørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
tikroneseddel/64,65,10,34,39,31
todøgnsregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
trabekel/64,65,10,34,39,31
trommehvirvel/64,65,10,34,39,31
tudemikkel/64,65,44,10,39,31
tvillingfødsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
tøjhandel/64,65,44,10,39,29
udtryksmiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
undtagelsesregel/64,65,10,34,39,31
vabel/64,65,10,34,39,31 ph:vabl
vandpartikel/64,65,10,34,39,31
variabel/64,65,10,34,39,31
ventrikel/64,65,10,34,39,31
vildæsel/64,10,34,66,39,31
virkemiddel/64,10,34,66,39,31
væsel/64,65,44,10,39,31 ph:væsl
ærindekørsel/64,65,10,34,39,29
